Washington statutes.
RCW 4.48.040

Qualifications of referees.

A person appointed by the court as a referee or who serves as a referee with the consent of the parties shall be:

(1) Qualified as a juror as provided by statute.

(2) Competent as juror between the parties.

(3) A duly admitted and practicing attorney.

[ 1984 c 258 s 515; Code 1881 s 251; 1877 p 51 s 255; 1859 p 61 s 255; 1854 p 169 s 209; RRS s 372.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.